Illinois, session 104th, SB4162.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Home 5for Good Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. 7    (a) The General Assembly recognizes the following: 8        (1) The Illinois prison system releases 15,000 people 9    each year, but without a cogent and unified statewide 10    system to support housing security and reduce the risk of 11    recidivism. 12        (2) A 2025 Loyola University Chicago Study found that 13    between 66% and 80% of individuals incarcerated in the 14    Illinois Department of Corrections experienced housing 15    instability or homelessness within 3 years prior to their 16    incarceration, making them at risk of homelessness after 17    prison as well.18        (3) Returning residents often struggle to access 19    housing and stable jobs because of State laws and policies 20    that permit housing discrimination against people with 21    records. For example, the Illinois Human Rights Act only 22    protects people with arrest records from housing-related 23    discrimination, but offers no such protections to persons   SB4162- 2 -LRB104 21001 KTG 34884 b1    with conviction records.2        (4) The current U.S. Department of Housing and Urban 3    Development policy on homelessness also creates barriers 4    that prevent formerly incarcerated individuals from 5    accessing permanent housing programs through the homeless 6    system.7        (5) A 2023 study of the Illinois Criminal Justice 8    Information Authority found that formerly incarcerated 9    people have an average unemployment rate of 45% and lower 10    annual wages, with Black individuals who are formerly 11    incarcerated having the highest rates of unemployment.12        (6) As a result, many people cannot comply with the 13    conditions of release, or they turn to the underground 14    economy to support themselves and their families. 15        (7) Research shows that housing instability, 16    homelessness, unemployment, and low wages are among the 17    factors that contribute to the nearly 40% of previously 18    incarcerated people returning to prison within 3 years.19        (8) According to a Spring 2025 Illinois Sentencing 20    Policy Advisory Council report, Illinois taxpayers already 21    pay $89,408 annually for each person incarcerated in State 22    prisons.23        (9) When a person returns to prison, the total cost 24    rises to $200,000, including direct and indirect costs, 25    resulting in unnecessary and expensive costs for all 26    Illinoisans.  SB4162- 3 -LRB104 21001 KTG 34884 b1        (10) The State government has a responsibility to 2    increase community safety and individual and family 3    well-being by addressing the housing needs of persons 4    leaving incarceration.5        (11) Affordable, safe, and stable housing is a 6    fundamental necessity for successful reentry and family 7    stability.8        (12) Affordable, safe, and stable housing for 9    returning residents also improves and promotes public 10    safety.11        (13) Without a dedicated commitment of affordable, 12    safe, and stable housing providing a mix of transitional 13    and permanent affordable housing that is informed by the 14    housing needs and policy perspectives of returning 15    residents, the State is failing to meet the needs of its 16    residents and communities. 17    (b) The General Assembly also recognizes that there are 18several independent strategies in place now that increase 19access to safe, affordable housing for returning residents and 20improve and promote public safety, including:21        (1) The Illinois Housing Development Authority (IHDA), 22    as administrator of the Rental Housing Support Program, 23    created the Re-Entry Program, providing 81 Reentry Rental 24    Housing Support Program subsidies across the State with 25    the support of housing navigators who build relationships 26    with landlords and connect returning residents to   SB4162- 4 -LRB104 21001 KTG 34884 b1    resources to support their success.2        (2) IHDA's Housing for Justice Involved Individuals 3    Program provides grants to community organizations to 4    acquire, build, or rehabilitate housing for the purpose of 5    creating transitional reentry housing beds across the 6    State, resulting in over 500 beds statewide.7        (3) IHDA's Housing Task Force added "justice-involved 8    individuals" as a priority population for IHDA's 2026 9    Annual Comprehensive Housing Plan.10        (4) The Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act created the 11    Restore, Reinvest, and Renew (R3) program, which reinvests 12    a portion of cannabis tax revenue into communities in 13    order to reduce gun violence through intervention and 14    prevention, improve reentry and diversion services for 15    people involved with the criminal justice system, provide 16    access to legal representation and advice, encourage 17    investment and economic growth, enhance youth development, 18    and support programs that improve the social determinants 19    of health.20        (5) Through the 2026 R3 Notice of Funding Opportunity 21    (CSFA Number 546-00-2378), the Illinois Criminal Justice 22    Information Authority and the R3 Board have committed up 23    to $35,000,000 as a set aside for reentry services, civil 24    legal aid services, and economic development in order to 25    provide returning residents with support and economic 26    opportunities.   SB4162- 5 -LRB104 21001 KTG 34884 b1    (c) It is the intent of the General Assembly to codify into 2law a comprehensive and unified statewide reentry program 3incorporating the existing reentry programs of the Illinois 4Housing Development Authority and the Illinois Criminal 5Justice Information Authority that: 6        (1) will meet a returning resident's housing needs and 7    is community-based;8        (2) includes ongoing active involvement by formerly 9    incarcerated persons;10        (3) provides a mix of transitional and permanent 11    affordable housing units, rental subsidies, and reentry 12    services supported by sustained and adequate funding; and13        (4) will have a positive long-term return on 14    investment for this State.  15    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act: 16    "Board" means the Home for Good Oversight Board. 17    "ICJIA" means the Illinois Criminal Justice Information 18Authority.19    "IDOC" means the Illinois Department of Corrections.20    "IHDA" means the Illinois Housing Development Authority.21    "Institute" means the Home for Good Institute. 22    "Program" means the Home for Good Program. 23    "Targeted population" means persons with arrest and 24conviction records and persons who are currently or formerly 25incarcerated.    SB4162- 6 -LRB104 21001 KTG 34884 b1    Section 15. Home for Good Program. The Home for Good 2Program is created as a statewide coordinated program designed 3to provide housing and services to the targeted population. 4The Program shall contain the following elements:5        (1) IHDA shall be responsible for providing 6    appropriate resources to potential applicants to acquire, 7    develop, and rehabilitate permanent affordable housing 8    units and transitional housing units that are designated 9    exclusively for the targeted population. The granting and 10    application process shall follow the existing program 11    model of the Housing for Justice Involved Individuals 12    Program. IHDA shall also be responsible for providing 13    site-based rental housing subsidies to community 14    organizations that work with the targeted population which 15    may be used to enter into lease agreements and master 16    lease agreements for the purpose of providing housing for 17    program participants and tenant-based rental subsidies.18        (2) ICJIA shall provide appropriate resources to 19    community organizations who work with the targeted 20    population. These resources shall be used to provide case 21    management and reentry navigation services to Program 22    participants. In addition, these resources shall be used 23    to make supportive services available to Program 24    participants. Services may include housing and related 25    services, physical and behavioral health, education,   SB4162- 7 -LRB104 21001 KTG 34884 b1    family reunification and relationship building, 2    transportation, job training, acquiring vital documents, 3    and meeting basic needs.4        (3) The Program shall require that a housing needs 5    assessment tool is administered to all individuals exiting 6    IDOC custody no later than 12 months prior to their 7    release date. The assessment shall be administered by a 8    community-based organization with demonstrable expertise 9    in reentry services, behavioral health, and permanent and 10    transitional affordable housing. The housing needs 11    assessment shall determine an individual's vulnerability 12    to housing instability or homelessness, and the assessment 13    shall identify the individual's behavioral health needs. 14    The purpose of the behavioral health element of the 15    assessment is to help potential participants successfully 16    secure housing and shall not be used as a reason to exclude 17    potential participants from the Program.18        (4) The Executive Directors of IHDA and ICJIA and the 19    Director of IDOC shall jointly create the Interagency Home 20    for Good Division. The Interagency Home for Good Division 21    shall be responsible for coordinating the activities of 22    the Program and designed to serve the housing and support 23    service needs of the targeted population.24        (5) The Executive Director of IHDA shall create the 25    Home for Good Institute. The Home for Good Institute shall 26    provide training and technical assistance to community   SB4162- 8 -LRB104 21001 KTG 34884 b1    organizations who intend to acquire, develop, 2    rehabilitate, or operate permanent and transitional 3    housing units for the targeted population. Community 4    organizations that successfully complete the training from 5    the Institute shall be awarded additional points on any 6    applications for funding from IHDA, including the Home for 7    Good Program.8        (6) The Home for Good Oversight Board is created for 9    the purposes of fostering collaboration between ICJIA, 10    IHDA, and IDOC and between these State agencies and 11    community-based organizations, and to ensure the equitable 12    provision of resources for affordable housing and support 13    services throughout the State based upon the geographic 14    distribution of incarcerated people exiting IDOC. The 15    Governor shall appoint members, unless otherwise 16    specified, not to exceed 25, to the Home for Good 17    Oversight Board. The Board shall be chaired by the chair 18    of the R3 Board, or his or her designee, and staffed by 19    ICJIA and IHDA personnel. Members of this Board shall 20    include:21            (A) the Executive Director of ICJIA or his or her 22        designee;23            (B) the Executive Director of IHDA or his or her 24        designee; 25            (C) the Director of IDOC or his or her designee;26            (D) the Reentry Director at the Department of   SB4162- 9 -LRB104 21001 KTG 34884 b1        Human Services or his or her designee;2            (E) the Director of Reentry for the City of 3        Chicago or his or her designee;4            (F) the Executive Director of the Illinois 5        Sentencing Policy Advisory Council or his or her 6        designee;7            (G) the Chief Homelessness Officer or his or her 8        designee;9            (H) 5 reentry advocates, at least 3 of whom must be 10        previously incarcerated; however, advocates who are 11        officers, members, or employees of entities that 12        receive money through the Program are not eligible for 13        appointment to the Board;14            (I) one representative of an affordable housing 15        development organization;16            (J) one representative of an affordable housing 17        advocacy organization;18            (K) one reentry researcher;19            (L) 5 community members with proportional 20        representation from urban, suburban, and rural areas 21        throughout the State; and 22            (M) one person each appointed by: 23                (i) the President of the Senate; 24                (ii) the Minority Leader of the Senate; 25                (iii) the Speaker of the House of 26            Representatives; and   SB4162- 10 -LRB104 21001 KTG 34884 b1                (iv) the Minority Leader of the House of 2            Representatives. 3         At least 5 of the up to 25 members appointed to the 4    Board by the Governor shall have personally experienced 5    incarceration and reentry.6        (7) The Home for Good Oversight Board shall monitor 7    the operation of the Interagency Home for Good Division 8    and the Home for Good Institute and ensure that the 9    Program fosters collaboration among State agencies and 10    community organizations, and establish a network of 11    housing providers and service providers for the Program. 12        (8) The Home for Good Oversight Board shall annually 13    submit to the General Assembly and the Governor a public 14    report containing data on the number of persons served, 15    the effectiveness of the Program as measured by criteria 16    established by the Home for Good Oversight Board, the 17    amount and type of housing made available through the 18    Program, the return on investment generated through 19    savings and economic activity resulting from the 20    implementation of the Program, a forecast of the number of 21    people exiting State prisons who are at risk of 22    experiencing housing instability and homelessness each 23    fiscal year, and a forecast of the number of affordable 24    homes needed to meet the needs of Program participants.  25    Section 20. Rules. IHDA, ICJIA, and IDOC shall jointly   SB4162- 11 -LRB104 21001 KTG 34884 b1adopt rules to implement this Act. The rules must describe how 2a housing needs assessment will be administered by 3community-based organizations with expertise in providing 4reentry services and permanent and transitional housing to 5persons incarcerated in IDOC no later than 12 months prior to 6their release date. 7    The rules must describe how a housing needs assessment 8will make the determinations described in paragraph (3) of 9Section 15. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.